Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska58-217
Mortgage, defined.

Mortgage shall mean a mortgage deed, deed of trust, or other instrument securing a mortgage loan and constituting a lien on real property held in fee simple or on a leasehold under a lease having a remaining term at the time such mortgage is acquired of not less than the term for repayment of the mortgage loan secured by such mortgage which is improved by residential housing.

Laws 1983, LB 626, § 17;

Laws 1991, LB 253, § 20.